Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2533.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3030.27, to read: START_STATUTE41-3030.27. Office of homeless services; termination July 1, 2030 A. The office of homeless services terminates on July 1, 2030. B. Title 41, chapter 37, article 6 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2031. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 37, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 6, to read: ARTICLE 6. Office of HOMELESS SERVICEs START_STATUTE41-4101. Definitions in this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Board" means the arizona homeless services board. 2. "Continuum of care organization" means a regional or local planning body designated by the united states department of housing and urban development. 3. "director" means the director of the Office. 4. "Executive committee" means the EXECUTIVE committee of the board. 5. "Homeless management information system" means an information technology system that: (a) is used to collect client data and data on housing and services provided to homeless INDIVIDUALS and INDIVIDUALS at risk of homelessness in this state. (b) Meets the requirements of the united states department of housing and urban DEVELOPMENT. 6. "Homeless services budget" means the annual budget and overview of all homeless services available in this state pursuant to section 41-4103. 7. "Office" means the Office of homeless services. 8. "Service provider" means an agency in this state or a city, town or county or private organization in this state that provides services to INDIVIDUALs WHO are EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS IN THIS STATE OR who are AT RISK OF BECOMING HOMELESS. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-4102. Office of homeless services; director; powers and duties A. The office of homeless services is established.  The office shall direct homeless services in the state. B. The governor shall appoint the director pursuant to section 38-211. The director is eligible to receive compensation pursuant to section 38-611. The office may employ clerical, professional and technical personnel subject to chapter 4, article 4 of this title and shall prescribe their duties and determine their compensation pursuant to section 38-611. C. The office shall: 1. direct homeless services in this state. 2. Manage and maintain, along with coordinating and sharing data with continuum of care organizations approved by the united states department of housing and urban development, a homeless management information system or any other data system in THis state that does all of the following: (a) Collects and Shares data from and with service providers, law enforcement agencies and agencies that address housing, social, welfare, workforce and health services in this state regarding INDIVIDUALs WHO are EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS IN THIS STATE OR WHO are AT RISK OF BECOMING HOMELESS. (b) Reports financial, program and outcome data to determine efficacy and oversight in reducing the number of homeless individuals and families in this state. D. The office may Apply for federal grants, loans and any other federal programs to provide monies for the office and to address homelessness in this state. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-4103. Director; powers and duties; annual report A. The Director shall: 1. In Cooperation with the board, develop and maintain an annual HOMELESS SERVICES BUDGET and overview of all homeless services AVAILABLE to residents in this state. 2. oversee monies provided for homeless services in this state. 3. provide administrative support to the board and serve as a member of the board. 4. at the governor's request, report directly to the governor on issues regarding homelessness in this state. 5. report to the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives at least twice each year on issues regarding homelessness in this state and any RECOMMENdations for improvement. 6. ensure that the annual homeless services budget pursuant to this section includes an overview, oversight and coordination plan for all funding sources for homeless services in this state, including from agencies in this state, continuum of care organizations, housing authorities, local governments, federal sources and private organizations. 7. Determine specific goals and measurable benchmarks for reducing homelessness, especially unsheltered homelessness, in this state and coordinating and integrating services for individuals experiencing homelessness among agencies in this state and all service providers in this state. 8. Provide OVERSIGHT to ensure the services are provided in an effective, safe, cost-effective and efficient manner and to accomplish this state's goals and benchmarks. 9. Implement innovative strategies and priorities and PROVIDE accountability and oversight to all recipients of federal, state and local homelessness assistance funding. 10. Oversee the use of electronic databases and improved data sharing among all service providers in the state. 11. employ an ombudsman to assist with the duties of the office. the ombudsman shall provide information to and Assist qualified property owners in this state with applying for a refund pursuant to section 42-17451. 12. Conduct an analysis and review of State, federal and local programs that address homelessness, including PROVIDING housing and shelter, integration of treatment for serious mental illnesses and substance use disorders, addiction recovery, public safety programs and workforce and self-sufficiency programs. 13. Prepare a statewide strategic plan for reducing the number of people experiencing homelessness, especially unsheltered homelessness, in this state. B. In providing finANCIAL OVERSIGHT AND ACCOUNTABILITY pursuant to this section, the director shall Prioritize the funding of programs and providers that have a documented history of successfully doing any of the following: 1. reducing the number of individuals experiencing homelessness in this state. 2. reducing the NUMBER OF UNSHELTERED HOMELESSness. 3. increasing the number of homeless individuals with serious mental illness or substance use disorders receiving treatment, including those subject to orders for involuntary treatment. 4. increasing earned income among program participants. 5. improving public safety by reducing calls for services, arrests and citizen complaints. C. On or before October 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, the director shall submit a report to Arizona department of housing for inclusion in the department's annual written report. The report shall include all of the following: 1. All information regarding the homeless services budget. 2. A strategic plan on how to ADEQUATELY address homelessness in this state. 3. recommendations regarding improvements to directing and providing services to individuals experiencing homelessness in this state. 4. in coordination with the board, a complete accounting of the office's disbursement of monies during the previous fiscal year from any grant program that is administered by the office. 5. An outcome report INDICATING the results of the office's activities in ATTAINing the office's goals and milestones. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-4104. Arizona homeless services board; membership; powers and duties; executive committee; annual report A. The arizona homeless services BOARD is established and CONSISTS of the following members: 1. A member who is appointed by the president of the senate. 2. A member who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 3. A REPRESENTATIVE of the private sector who has knowledge REGARDING homelessness in this state and who is appointed by the governor. 4. The director or the director's designee. 5. a statewide philanthropic leader who is appointed by governor, based on the RECOMMENDATION of an organization that helps support nonprofit organizations in this state. 6. an individual who experienced homelessness and who is appointed by the Speaker of the house of representatives. 7. A representative of a nonprofit organization that represents all of the county officials in this state and who is appointed by the President of the senate. B. Members of the board, except for the director, shall serve four-year terms, and when a vacancy occurs, the replacement is appointed for the unexpired term in the same manner as the initial appointment. C. The BOARD shall select a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its membership. D. The board shall elect from its own membership a four-member executive committee. E. The BOARD shall meet QUARTERLY or at the call of the chairperson.  The chairperson shall provide notice of the meeting to the members at least three calendar days before the meeting. F. A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum of the board at any meeting, and the action of the majority of members present constitutes the action of the board. G. Members of the board are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2. H. The office shall provide staff and administrative support to the board. I. Members of the board may serve more than one term. J. The board shall: 1. review local and regional plans and directions for providing services to individuals experiencing homelessness and reducing the number of homeless INDIVIDUALS and families in this state. 2. cooperate with municipalities in this state to do all of the following: (a) develop milestones and metrics for reducing homelessness, especially unsheltered homelessness, in each municipality's respective region. (b) develop a spending plan that administers and provides oversight and accountability for the funding supplied to local stakeholders. (c) Determine outcomes and set targets to address specific needs in each community. 3. Implement performance and accountability measures for service providers, including the support of collecting consistent and transparent data. 4. regularly update the strategic plan on homelessness pursuant to section 41-4103 to reflect trends in homelessness and outcomes as identified by the review of local data and PERFORMANCE and accountability metrics. 5. set annual state and local goals for reducing homelessness among the target populations identified by the board. 6. make recommendations for strategies to reduce illegal drug use within homeless shelters, transitional housing and permanent supportive housing in this state. 7. facilitate connections to alternative support systems, including behavioral health services, addiction recovery and residential services for INDIVIDUALs WHO are EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS IN THIS STATE OR INDIVIDUALs WHO are AT RISK OF BECOMING HOMELESS. 8. Require participation in the HOMELESS MANAGEMENT INFORMATION SYSTEM and other state data systems and require data sharing agreements among all participants, including homeless services, physical health systems, mental health systems and the criminal justice system. 9. work with the director, the Department of Health Services and the state Department of Corrections to reduce RECIDIVISM and returns to homelessness. 10. establish rules and standards for beds located in homeless shelters in this state, including assigning priority to INDIVIDUALS discharged from the Arizona state hospital. K. The executive committee pursuant to this section shall act in an advisory capacity for the board and make recommendations regarding the board's duties. L. The executive committee does not have authority to make decisions independent of THE BOARD. M. On or before december 31, 2027 and each year thereafter, the board shall submit an annual report to the governor, the PRESIDENT of the senate and the speaker of the house of REPRESENTATIVES that includes all of the following: 1. the state's year-to-date progress toward achieving the office's milestones, goals and metrics, including: (a) the reduction in the number of unsheltered homeless in this state. (b) the increase in the number of homeless individuals enrolled or ordered into treatment. (c) The increased earnings of participants of federally, state and locally funded programs. 2. The number of individuals served and the number of individuals returning for services. 3. The number of individuals with outstanding warrants. 4. The number of homeless sex offenders. 5. The number of illegal ENCAMPMENTS.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Initial terms of the members of the Arizona homeless services board A. Notwithstanding section 41-4104, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, the initial terms of board members who are appointed pursuant to section 41-4104, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, are: 1. Two terms ending January 1, 2030. 2. Two terms ending January 1, 2031. 3. Two terms ending January 1, 2032. B. All subsequent appointments shall be made as prescribed by law. Sec. 4. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection E, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature establishes the office of homeless services to direct homeless services in this state.